Missouri, session 2026, HB2904.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 578.012, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 578.006 and 578.012, to read as follows:
578.006. 1. A person commits the offense of making a malicious false report of
animal abuse if:
(1) The person purposely makes a report to a law enforcement agency or an
applicable government agency alleging the abuse of any animal in a manner punishable
under section 578.012;
(2) The person knows that such a report is false;
(3) The person makes the report with the purpose of disrupting, harassing,
causing a monetary loss to, or disturbing the peace of the owner of the animal; and
(4) Such report causes a disruption, harassment, monetary loss, or disturbance
of the owner of the animal.
2. The offense of making a malicious false report of animal abuse is a class C
misdemeanor.
3. It shall be an absolute defense for a prosecution of the offense of making a
malicious false report of animal abuse if the reporting party reported an incident of
animal abuse out of a good faith, reasonable belief that an animal was being abused.
The defendant shall have the burden of injecting this defense under this subsection. If a
defendant asserts that his or her report of animal abuse was made from a good faith,
reasonable belief that an animal was being abused, the state shall have the burden to
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2904 2
prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant did not have a good faith,
reasonable belief that such a report was true.
578.012. 1. A person commits the offense of animal abuse if he or she:
(1) Intentionally or purposely kills an animal in any manner not allowed by or
expressly exempted from the provisions of sections 578.005 to 578.023 and 273.030;
(2) Purposely or intentionally causes injury or suffering to an animal; or
(3) Having ownership or custody of an animal knowingly fails to provide adequate
care which results in substantial harm to the animal.
2. Animal abuse is a class A misdemeanor, unless the defendant has previously been
found guilty of animal abuse or the suffering involved in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of
this section is the result of torture [or], mutilation [consciously], or starvation knowingly
inflicted while the animal was alive, in which case it is a class E felony.
✔